Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-220
Sections; applicability.

Sections 32-221 to 32-228 shall apply to counties which have an election commissioner as provided in section 32-207 or 32-211.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 40.